Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 35. Farmers Market System.

§ 3.2-3500.
Development of farmers market system.

In overseeing the development of a farmers market system, the Board shall:

Identify farmers market needs throughout the Commonwealth;

Promote the orderly growth and development of farmers markets;

Promote public awareness of farmers markets;

Promote the coordination of Virginia’s farmers market development with other segments of the Commonwealth’s economy, such as tourism, horticultural production and marketing, fruit and vegetable production and marketing, retail trade, wholesale trade, intrastate marketing, interstate marketing, and new marketing ventures such as electronic marketing; and

Advise the Governor on the development of the system of state-owned farmers market facilities.

History.

1986, c. 375, § 3.1-73.3; 1989, c. 413; 2001, cc. 17, 398; 2009, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to the Local Food and Farming Infrastructure Grant Program, see §

3.2-311

.

§ 3.2-3501.
Commissioner to manage farmers market operations.

In order to establish, operate and maintain a system of state-owned farmers market facilities within the Commonwealth, the Commissioner may carry out the provisions of this chapter, including the power to:

Cooperate with various state agencies and other organizations contributing to the development of the farmers market system;

Develop and implement policy for the management of state-owned farmers market facilities, including:

Guidelines for fees to be charged at the markets;

Standards for evaluating market operations;

Criteria for the expansion of existing state-owned farmers market facilities and the establishment of new markets in the future;

Changes in management of markets; and

Guidelines for the award of contracts for market management.

Employ such personnel as necessary to operate the system of markets in accordance with the Virginia Personnel Act (§

2.2-2900

et seq.);

Receive and dispense funds;

Develop and manage a program budget for the farmers market system;

Provide marketing and promotional services for the farmers market system;

Develop detailed technical plans for, acquire or build, and manage the farmers market system;

Conduct such studies as are necessary to ensure the success of the farmers market system;

Make contracts and agreements and execute other instruments necessary for the operation of the farmers market system;

Enter into agreements with and accept grants from any governmental agency in furtherance of this chapter;

Enter into joint ventures with cities, towns, counties or combinations thereof in developing wholesale, shipping point, and retail farmers markets; and

Rent or purchase land and facilities as deemed necessary to establish markets or to enhance farmers market development.

If a market in the network is operated pursuant to a contract between the Commissioner and the market operator, such contract shall require that the operator annually submit to the Commissioner a plan for, and a report on, the operation of the market. The plan shall describe the operator’s goals for the coming year as to the acreage to be served by the market, the types of crops to be sold at the market, and the number of brokers, buyers, and producers to utilize the market. The report shall describe the extent to which the goals for the previous year were met.

History.

1989, c. 413, § 3.1-73.5; 2000, c. 536; 2001, cc. 17, 398; 2005, c. 633; 2008, c. 860; 2017, c. 5.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 5 deleted the last sentence in subsection B, which required an annual report to Committee chairmen summarizing the market operators’ reports and plans; deleted former subsection C, which required an annual report to the Board on receipt and expenditure of funds, etc., in state-owned farmers market facilities.

§ 3.2-3502.
Local retail farmers markets.

Any locality may establish, operate and maintain a local retail farmers market. The local retail farmers market may request to be part of the network of farmers markets within the Commonwealth or may be independent of such network. Nothing in this section shall invalidate the actions of any locality taken prior to enactment of this section.

History.

2000, c. 15, § 3.1-73.5:1; 2008, c. 860.